California statutes. Public Resources Code
The board may, by regulation, delegate its authority and responsibilities under this article to the director if it determines that the director can more efficiently exercise such authority and carry out such responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4628.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this article or of Section 4581, no public agency shall be required to submit a timber harvesting plan or file an application for conversion with the board where the purpose of its timber operations is to construct or maintain a right-of-way on its own or on any other public property.

(b) Removal of trees for subdivision development, except on lands zoned as a timberland production zone pursuant to Section 51112 or 51113 of, and as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 51104, of the Government Code, where the subdivision has had a tentative subdivision map approved and a subdivision use permit granted by the city or county having jurisdiction, may be exempted by regulation from the provisions of this article, if the exemption is consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 636, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund [4629. - 4629.13.]

4629.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) A thriving in-state forest products sector provides public benefits, including employment opportunities in both rural and urban areas, and economic development for rural communities.

(b) Enabling continued economically viable production of forest products can help to protect the state’s forest lands from conversion to other uses.

(c) The state’s forest practice regulations provide for environmental protection of the state’s air, water, habitat, geology, and soil resources.

(d) Consumers of wood products in the state currently do not directly pay for the state’s forest practice program and the costs of protecting the state’s natural resources.

(e) Current in-state producers of wood products already bear a significant cost of conforming with the state’s environmental laws, which economically disadvantages those producers relative to out-of-state production.

(f) Conforming with the state’s environmental laws ensures that wildlife, habitat, clean air, forest, and water quality receive some protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 21.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.1.

The Legislature further finds that the state’s forest practice regulatory program needs to develop adequate performance measures to provide transparency for both the regulated community and other stakeholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 289, Sec. 3.   (AB 1492)   Effective September 11, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.2.

In enacting this article, it is the intent of the Legislature to accomplish all of the following:

(a) Promote and encourage sustainable forest practices consistent with provisions of this chapter in a manner consistent with other laws, including, but not limited to, the Timberland Productivity Act of 1982 (Article 1 (commencing with Section 51100) of Chapter 6.7 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), the Porter-Cologne Water Quality Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 13000) of Division 7 of the Water Code), and the California Endangered Species Act (Article 3 (commencing with Section 2080) of Chapter 1.5 of
 Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code).

(b) Ensure continued sustainable funding for the state’s forest practice program to protect the state’s forest resources, and replace the current piecemeal funding structure with a single funding source.

(c) Support in-state production of timber within the state’s environmental standards, and promote and encourage retention of forests and forested landscapes.

(d) Create a funding source for the restoration of the state’s forested lands and promote restoration of fisheries and wildlife habitat and improvement in water quality.

(e) Promote restoration and management of forested landscapes consistent with the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health
 and Safety Code).

(f) Promote transparency in regulatory costs and programs through the creation of performance measures and accountability for the state’s forest practice regulatory program and simplify the collection and use of critical data to ensure consistency with other pertinent laws and regulations.

(g) Identify and implement efficiencies in the regulation of timber harvesting between state agencies.

(h) Modify current regulatory programs to incorporate, and provide incentives for best practices, and develop standards or strategies, where appropriate, to protect natural resources, including the development of plans that address road management and riparian function on an ownershipwide, watershedwide, or districtwide scale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 289, Sec. 3.   (AB 1492)   Effective September 11, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.3.

(a)   The Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. All revenues received from the assessments imposed pursuant to Section 4629.5, less amounts deducted for refunds and reimbursements, shall be deposited into the fund.

(b) Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply to this article:

(1) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(2) “Department” means the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(3) “Engineered wood product” means
 a building product, including, but not limited to, veneer-based sheeting material, plywood, laminated veneer lumber (LVL), parallel-laminated veneer (PLV), laminated beams, I-joists, edge-glued material, or composite material such as cellulosic fiberboard, hardboard, decking, particleboard, waferboard, flakeboard, oriented strand board (OSB), or any other panel or composite product where wood is a component part, that is identified in regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 4629.4. For purpose of this paragraph, an “engineered wood product” shall only include products that consist of at least 10 percent wood.

(4) “Fund” means the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund.

(5) “Lumber product” means a product in which wood or wood fiber is a principal component part, including, but not limited to, a solid wood product, or an engineered wood product, that is
 identified in regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 4629.4. “Lumber product” does not include furniture, paper products, indoor flooring products such as hardwood or laminated flooring, bark or cork products, firewood, or other products not typically regarded as lumber products.

(6) “Principal component part” means 10 percent of the total content by volume.

(7) “Qualified nonprofit organization” means any nonprofit public benefit corporation formed pursuant to the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) qualified to do business in California and qualified for exempt status under Section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(8) “Recognized tribe” means those entities recognized as eligible to receive service
 from the United States Bureau of Indian Affairs, as listed in the Federal Register, and those tribes designated in the list of nonrecognized tribes for California by the Native American Heritage Commission.

(9) “State responsibility area” means those areas for which the state has primary fire protection responsibility, as designated by the board in accordance with Section 4125.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 289, Sec. 3.   (AB 1492)   Effective September 11, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.4.

(a)   On or before October 1, 2012, the board shall adopt a regulation that interprets and makes specific the lumber products and engineered wood products that the board determines shall be subject to the lumber products assessment imposed pursuant to Section 4629.5. The board shall annually update the regulation. The lumber products identified in the annually updated regulation that is adopted shall become subject to the assessment imposed pursuant to Section 4629.5 on the first day of the calender quarter commencing more than 60 days after adoption of the updated regulation.

(b) The board shall adopt any regulations or emergency regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article in accordance with the
 rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of title 2 of the Government Code). The board may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as or substantially equivalent to an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section. The initial adoption of emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this subdivision shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. The initial emergency regulation and the one readoption of an emergency regulation authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulation and the one readoption of an emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect
 for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations may be adopted. The lumber products and engineered wood products identified in the regulation adopted shall become subject to the assessment imposed pursuant to Section 4629.5, commencing January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 289, Sec. 3.   (AB 1492)   Effective September 11, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.5.

(a) (1) There is hereby imposed an assessment on a person who purchases a lumber product or an engineered wood product for storage, use, or other consumption in this state, at the rate of 1 percent of the sales price.

(2) A retailer shall charge the person the amount of the assessment as a charge that is separate from, and not included in, any other fee, charge, or other amount paid by the purchaser.

(3) The retailer shall collect the assessment from the person at the time of sale, and may retain reimbursement pursuant to Sections 2000 and 2001 of Title 18 of the California Code of
 Regulations, as approved by the State Board of Equalization at its September 10, 2013, meeting, for startup costs associated with the collection of the assessment, to be taken on the first return or next consecutive returns until the entire reimbursement amount is retained.

(b) The retailer shall separately state the amount of the assessment imposed under this section on the sales receipt given by the retailer to the person at the time of sale.

(c) The State Board of Equalization shall administer and collect the assessment imposed by this section pursuant to the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) with those changes as may be necessary to conform to this article. For purposes of this section, the references in the Fee Collection Procedures Law to “fee” shall include the assessment imposed by this
 section, and references to “feepayer” shall include a person required to pay the assessment imposed by this article, which includes the retailer.

(d) (1) The assessment is required to be collected by a retailer and any amount unreturned to the person who paid an amount in excess of the assessment, but was collected from the person under the representation by the retailer that it was owed as an assessment, constitutes debts owed by the retailer to this state.

(2) A person who purchases a lumber product or an engineered wood product for storage, use, or other consumption in this state is liable for the assessment until it has been paid to this state, except that payment to a retailer relieves the person from further liability for the assessment. Any assessment collected from a person that has not been remitted to the
 State Board of Equalization shall be a debt owed to the state by the retailer required to collect and remit the assessment. This part does not impose any obligation upon a retailer to take any legal action to enforce the collection of the assessment imposed by this section.

(3) An excluded retailer, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), shall provide a notice to a purchaser of qualified lumber products or engineered wood products regarding the purchaser’s obligation to remit the assessment to the State Board of Equalization. Section 4601 does not apply to this paragraph.

(e) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the State Board of Equalization may prescribe, adopt, and enforce regulations relating to the administration and
 enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, collections, reporting, refunds, and appeals.

(f) (1) The assessment imposed by this section is due and payable to the State Board of Equalization quarterly on or before the last day of the month next succeeding each quarterly period.

(2) On or before the last day of the month following each quarterly period, a return for the preceding quarterly period shall be filed with the State Board of Equalization using electronic media, in the form prescribed by the State Board of Equalization. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods, as prescribed by the State Board of Equalization.

(g) For purposes of this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) “Purchase” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 6010 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) (A) “Retailer” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 6015 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) A retailer with de minimis sales of qualified lumber products and engineered wood products of less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) during the previous calendar year is not a retailer for purposes of this section, except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).

(3) “Sales price” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 6011 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(4) “Storage” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 6008 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(5) “Use” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 6009 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(h) (1) A person required to pay the assessment imposed under this article shall register with the State Board of Equalization. Every application for registration shall be made in a form prescribed by the State Board of Equalization and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of the person’s place or places of business, and any other information that
 the State Board of Equalization may require. An application for registration shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the State Board of Equalization.

(2) An application for registration filed pursuant to this section may be filed using electronic media as prescribed by the State Board of Equalization.

(3) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disc, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.   (AB 2031)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.6.

Moneys deposited in the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, only be expended for the following purposes:

(a) To reimburse the State Board of Equalization for its administrative costs associated with the administration, collection, audit, and issuance of refunds related to the lumber products and engineered wood assessment established pursuant to Section 4629.5.

(b) To pay refunds issued pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) To support the activities and costs of the department, the Department of Conservation, the Department of Fish and
 Wildlife, the State Water Resources Control Board, and regional water quality control boards associated with the review of projects or permits necessary to conduct timber operations. On or after July 1, 2013, except for fees applicable for fire prevention or protection within state responsibility area classified lands or timber yield assessments, no currently authorized or required fees shall be charged by the agencies listed in this subdivision for activities or costs associated with the review of a project, inspection and oversight of projects, and permits necessary to conduct timber operations of those departments and boards.

(d) For transfer to the department’s Forest Improvement Program for forest resources improvement grants and projects administered by the department pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4790) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4799.06) of Part 2.5.

(e) To fund existing restoration grant programs, with priority given to the Fisheries Restoration Grant Program administered by the Department of Fish and Wildlife and grant programs administered by state conservancies.

(f) (1) As a loan to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for activities to address environmental damage occurring on forest lands resulting from marijuana cultivation. Not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) may be loaned from the fund in a fiscal year pursuant to this paragraph. This paragraph shall become inoperative on July 1, 2017.

(2) Any funds deposited into the fund pursuant to subdivision (d) or (f) of Section 12025 or subdivision (b), (c), (e), or (f) of Section 12025.1 of the Fish and Game Code shall be credited toward loan repayment.

(3) Moneys from the General Fund shall not be used to repay a loan authorized pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) To the department for fuel treatment grants and projects pursuant to authorities under the Wildland Fire Protection and Resources Management Act of 1978 (Article 1 (commencing with Section 4461) of Chapter 7).

(h) To the department to provide grants to local agencies responsible for fire protection, qualified nonprofits, recognized tribes, local and state governments, and resources conservation districts, undertaken on a state responsibility area (SRA) or on wildlands not in an SRA that pose a threat to the SRA, to reduce the costs of wildland fire suppression, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, promote adaptation of forested landscapes to changing climate, improve forest health, and protect homes and communities.

(i) To the Natural Resources Agency to provide a reasonable per diem for attendance at a meeting of the advisory body for the state’s forest practice program by a member of the body who is not an employee of a government agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 33.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.7.

All grants made pursuant to subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 4629.6 shall fund activities that do any of the following, in order of priority:

(a) Improve forest health.

(b) Promote climate mitigation strategies included in the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code) scoping plan for the forest sector, as adopted by the State Air Resources Control Board, or as amended through subsequent actions of that board.

(c) Promote climate change adaptation strategies for the forest sector, as adopted by the Natural Resources Agency in the
 California Climate Adaptation Strategy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 134.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.8.

(a) Funds deposited in the fund shall be appropriated in accordance with the following priorities:

(1) First priority shall be for funding associated with the administration and delivery of responsibilities identified in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 4629.6.

(2) Only after paragraph (1) is funded, the second priority shall be, if deposits are sufficient in future years to maintain the fund, by 2016, at a minimum reserve of four million dollars ($4,000,000), for use and appropriation by the Legislature in years during which revenues to the account are projected to fall short of the ongoing budget allocations for support of the activities
 identified in paragraph (1).

(3) Only after paragraphs (1) and (2) are funded, the third priority shall be in support of activities designated in subdivisions (d) to (f), inclusive, of Section 4629.6.

(4) Only after paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, are funded, the fourth priority shall be to support the activities designated in subdivisions (g) to (i), inclusive, of Section 4629.6.

(b) Funds shall not be used to pay for or reimburse any requirements, including mitigation of a project proponent or applicant, as a condition of any permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 34.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.9.

(a) On or before January 10, 2013, and on each January 10 thereafter in conjunction with the 2014–15 Governor’s Budget and each Governor’s Budget thereafter, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with the Secretary for Environmental Protection, shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a report on the activities of all state departments, agencies, and boards relating to forest and timberland regulation. This report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) A listing, by organization, of the proposed total costs associated with the review, approval, and inspection of timber harvest plans and associated permits.

(2) The number of timber harvest plans,
 and acreage covered by the plans, reviewed in the 2011–12 fiscal year, or the most recent fiscal year.

(3) To the extent feasible, a listing of activities, personnel, and funding, by department, for the forest practice program for 2012–13, or the most recent fiscal year, and the preceding 10 fiscal years.

(4) The number of staff in each organization dedicated fully or partially to (A) review of timber harvest plans, and (B) other forestry-related activities, by geographical location in the state.

(5) The costs of other forestry-related activities undertaken.

(6) A summary of any process improvements identified by the administration as part of ongoing review of the timber harvest process, including data and technology improvement needs.

(7) Workload analysis for the forest practice program in each organization.

(8) In order to assess efficiencies in the program and the effectiveness of spending, a set of measures for, and a plan for collection of data on, the program, including, but not limited to:

(A) The number of timber harvest plans reviewed.

(B) Average time for plan review.

(C) Number of field inspections per inspector.

(D) Number of acres under active plans.

(E) Number of violations.

(F) Evaluating ecological performance.

(b) A report required to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 171.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.11.

(a)   Notwithstanding any other law, the revenues in any fiscal year may be accounted for on an accrued basis. The department may borrow against anticipated revenues to the fund to meet cashflow needs.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a loan obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be interest free. The department shall repay the loan in a timely manner from reserves received into the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 289, Sec. 3.   (AB 1492)   Effective September 11, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.12.

(a)   The Director of Finance shall authorize a loan, from the General Fund to the fund, to implement the activities described in Section 4629.6.

(b) Any loan made pursuant to this section shall be repaid, with interest at the pooled money investment rate, from revenues from the assessment imposed pursuant to Section 4629.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 289, Sec. 3.   (AB 1492)   Effective September 11, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.13.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund, as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Any such loan shall be exempt from paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16310 of the Government Code. Interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund and shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which the money is loaned. This section does not authorize any transfer that would interfere with the carrying out of the object for which these funds were created.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 289, Sec. 3.   (AB 1492)   Effective September 11, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Innovative Forest Products and Mass Timber [4630. - 4630.2.]

4630.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Innovative forest products” means products made using small-diameter woody materials, brush, and dead trees removed from fire hazard areas identified by the department and that are milled and manufactured in California to the maximum extent possible.

(b) “Mass timber” means prefabricated wood products consisting of not less than three layers of solid-sawn lumber or structural composite lumber in which adjacent layers are cross-oriented and bonded with structural adhesives, dowels, or nails to form a solid wood element and that are milled and manufactured in California to the maximum extent
 possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 637, Sec. 2.   (AB 2518)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4630.1.

(a) On or before July 1, 2020, the department, in consultation with the board, shall identify barriers to in-state production of mass timber and other innovative forest products and shall develop solutions that are consistent with the state’s climate objectives on forest lands.

(b) The department shall collaborate, in implementing this section, with members of the working group established pursuant to Section 717, other state agencies, and independent experts, including with apprenticeship programs of organized labor, community colleges, and others with similar expertise, on innovative forest products and mass timber workforce training and job creation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 238.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4630.2.

(a) On or before July 1, 2020, the Forest Management Task Force or its successor entity shall, in consultation with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, the Joint Institute for Wood Products Innovation in the Board of Forestry and Fire Protection, private industry, investors, and other stakeholders it deems appropriate, develop recommendations for siting additional wood product manufacturing facilities in the state. These recommendations shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A financially viable proposal for the development and construction of at least one new mass timber production facility that can manufacture mass timber panels
 that can be cross or dowel laminated or use similar mass timber technology.

(2) The identification and proposal of the necessary incentives needed to attract private investment to construct such a mass timber production facility in California.

(3) The identification of other former manufacturing or wood processing sites that may be suitable for future investment.

(b) In developing the recommendations pursuant to subdivision (a), it is the intent of the Legislature that the location and activities of the mass timber production facilities, to the extent feasible, meet all of the following:

(1) Be adjacent to a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, as
 identified by the department, and be capable of processing materials generated as a result of fuel treatments or other forest management practices.

(2) Generate mass timber workforce training and job creation opportunities.

(3) Be located in, or be proximate to, areas that are near the locations of large landscape fires of greater than 50,000 acres that have occurred since 2005 and in areas identified as federal opportunity zones or in areas that have an average household income of at least 5 percent below the state’s median household income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 399, Sec. 5.   (AB 1823)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. State Forest [4631. - 4664.]



  ARTICLE 1. Purposes and Policies [4631. - 4631.5.]

4631.

It is hereby declared to be in the interest of the welfare of the people of this state and their industries and other activities involving the use of wood, lumber, poles, piling, and other forest products, that desirable cutover forest lands, including those having young and old timber growth, be made fully productive and that the holding and reforestation of such lands is a necessary measure predicated on waning supplies of original old growth timber. It is further declared to be the policy of the state to acquire by purchase, exchange, lease, or grant all of the following:

(a) Such cutover lands, the reforestation of which is not assured under private ownership, to reforest such lands during periods of unemployment and at other times.

(b) Liquidating forest lands primarily suitable for timber production which may be acquired under precutting agreements.

(c) Demonstration forests of 2,000 acres or less adapted to furnish local needs of investigation, demonstration, and education in those timber counties where the ownership pattern is such that management of small areas is an important problem.

(d) One area, not to exceed approximately 40,000 acres, in each of the following forest districts, Coast Range Pine and Fir District, North Sierra Pine District and the South Sierra Pine District, for the purpose of demonstration of economical forest management. These areas shall not include virgin timber except that which is incidental to areas previously harvested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4631.5.

It is further declared to be in the interest of the welfare of the people of this state that the state do all of the following:

(a) Retain the existing land base of state forests in timber production for research and demonstration purposes.

(b) Cooperate with local governments in mitigating the impacts on school enrollment of geothermal development which occurs in proximity to state-owned forest lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective February 6, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [4635. - 4643.]

4635.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4636.

“Continuous production” means such management as will approach a balance between depletion and growth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4637.

“Forest land” means lands primarily suited to growing timber and other forest products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4638.

“Forest products” includes sawlogs, pilings, poles, split products, pulpwood, bolts, bark and other products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.

“Management” means the handling of forest crop and forest soil so as to achieve maximum sustained production of high quality forest products while giving consideration to values relating to recreation, watershed, wildlife, range and forage, fisheries, and aesthetic enjoyment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

4640.

“Protection” means protection of forest trees against damage by fire, insects, disease, and trespass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4641.

“Purchase area” means an area of forest land within which forest lands of sufficient acreage may be available and can be consolidated to make state forest units.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4642.

“Reforestation” includes reforestation by natural means from seed and artificially by seeding or planting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4643.

“State forest” means forest land owned or to be owned by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Forests [4645. - 4659.]

4645.

The department, in accordance with plans approved by the board, may engage in the management, protection, and reforestation of state forests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4646.

The director, acting in accordance with policies adopted by the board, shall administer this chapter. The director may exercise all powers necessary to accomplish its purposes and intent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 89.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4647.

The department shall prepare a map setting forth the boundaries of purchase areas, and it shall prepare data relating to the forest conditions within these areas. In the preparation of the map and data the department shall be guided by, but not limited to, a report prepared and submitted to the Legislature by the California Forestry Study Committee provided for in Chapter 1086, Statutes of 1943. The department shall make the necessary surveys, examinations, appraisals, inventories, and title searches and obtain other pertinent data and information bearing on tracts of forest land offered for sale for state forest purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.

(a) Acquisition of forest land pursuant to this chapter shall be made only upon the approval of the director. Approval by the director shall be based on satisfactory evidence presented to the director by the board as to the suitability and desirability of lands under consideration for purchase for state forest purposes. This suitability and desirability shall be predicated on, but not limited to, all of the following factors:

(1) That the lands are suited primarily to timber growing.

(2) That the lands represent growing capacities not below the average for the timber region.

(3) That they are favorably situated for multiple use and economical administration, management, and utilization.

(b) The director shall not approve the acquisition of any lands pursuant to this chapter unless the director receives a resolution recommending the action adopted by the board of supervisors of the county in which those lands are situated following a public hearing held by the board of supervisors on the proposed acquisition. Notice of the hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. The holding of a hearing shall be optional to the board of supervisors for areas of 2,000 acres or less. Upon approval of a purchase by the director, the department may negotiate for and consummate the purchase of the
 lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 90.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4649.

Whenever it is deemed advisable and advantageous, the board may enter into an agreement with the Department of Corrections, or the Youth Authority for employment of inmates of these institutions in work on state forests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4650.

(a) With the approval of the Director of General Services, the director may make sales of forest products from state forests that do not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value without advertising for bids. With the approval of the Director of General Services, the director may also make sales that do not exceed 100,000 board feet of dead, dying, downed, diseased, or defective trees, trees harvested in connection therewith for thinning purposes or other forest improvement work, or any combination thereof, without advertising for bids. 

(b) Any sale of forest products in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value, or in excess of 100,000 board feet with respect to dead, dying, downed, diseased, or defective trees, trees harvested in connection therewith for thinning purposes or other forest improvement work, or any combination thereof, shall be upon competitive bids. Advertising for bids shall be the same as is generally in use for the sale of state property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   Effective June 10, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

4650.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, timber from state forests shall not be sold to any California division of a primary manufacturer, or to any person for resale to a primary manufacturer, who does either of the following:

(1) Uses that timber at any plant not located within the United States unless it is sawn on four sides to dimensions not greater than 4 inches by 12 inches.

(2) Within one year prior to the bid date and one year after the termination of the contract, sells unprocessed timber, which is harvested from private timberlands and is exported into foreign commerce from this state.

(b) Any purchaser of timber from state forests who makes use of timber in violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is prohibited from purchasing state forest timber for a period of five years and may have his or her license suspended for a period of up to one year.

(c) The department may adopt appropriate regulations to prevent the substitution of timber from state forests for timber exported from private timberlands.

(d) For purposes of this section, “unprocessed timber” means trees or portions of trees or other roundwood not processed to standards and specifications suitable for end product use, but does not include timber processed into any of the following:

(1) Lumber or construction timbers, except Western Red Cedar, meeting current American Lumber Standards Grades or Pacific Lumber Inspection Bureau Export R or N list grades, sawn on four sides, not intended for remanufacture.

(2) Lumber, construction timbers, or cants for remanufacture, except Western Red Cedar, meeting current American Lumber Standards Grades or Pacific Lumber Inspection Bureau Export R or N list clear grades, sawn on four sides, not to exceed 12 inches in thickness.
